Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.087

Building permit and plan review fees—Agricultural structures.

Permitting and plan review fees under this chapter for agricultural structures may only cover the costs to counties, cities, towns, and other municipal corporations of processing applications, inspecting and reviewing plans, preparing detailed statements required by chapter 43.21C RCW, and performing necessary inspections under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 362 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—2009 c 362: "The legislature finds that permit and inspection fees for new agricultural structures should not exceed the direct and indirect costs associated with reviewing permit applications, conducting inspections, and preparing specific environmental documents." [ 2009 c 362 s 1.]